Missouri, session 2026, SB1081.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 407.828, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 407.828,
3 to read as follows:
1 407.828. 1. Notwithstanding any provision in a
2 franchise to the contrary, each franchisor shall specify in
3 writing to each of its franchisees in this state the
4 franchisee's obligations for preparation, delivery, and
5 warranty service on its products. The franchisor shall
6 fairly and reasonably compensate the franchisee for
7 preparation, delivery, and warranty service required of the
8 franchisee by the franchisor. The franchisor shall provide
9 the franchisee with the schedule of compensation to be paid
10 to the franchisee for parts, labor, and service, and the
11 time allowance for the performance of the labor and service
12 for the franchisee's obligations for preparation, delivery,
13 and warranty and recall service.
14 2. [The schedule of compensation shall include
15 reasonable compensation for diagnostic work, as well as
16 repair service and labor for the franchisee to meet its
17 obligations for preparation, delivery, and warranty
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1081 2
18 service. The schedule shall also include reasonable and
19 adequate time allowances for the diagnosis and performance
20 of preparation, delivery, and warranty service to be
21 performed in a careful and professional manner. In the
22 determination of what constitutes reasonable compensation
23 for labor and service pursuant to this section, the
24 principal factor to be given consideration shall be the
25 prevailing wage rates being charged for similar labor and
26 service by the franchisee for similar labor and service to
27 retail customers for nonwarranty labor and service. The
28 primary factor in determining reasonable compensation for
29 parts under this section shall be the amount charged by the
30 franchisee for similar parts to retail customers for
31 nonwarranty parts] (1) Fair and reasonable compensation
32 requires the franchisor to pay each franchisee no less than
33 the amount the retail customer pays for the same services
34 with regard to rate and time. Any schedule of compensation
35 previously agreed to by the franchisor and the franchisee
36 for extended warranty repairs may be used in lieu of actual
37 time expended. In the event that a schedule of compensation
38 has not been agreed to for warranty repairs, or said
39 schedule does not define time for an applicable warranty
40 repair, the franchisor's schedule of compensation shall be
41 used, multiplied by one and four-tenths. In no event shall
42 such compensation fail to include full compensation for
43 diagnostic work, as well as repair service, labor, and
44 parts. Time allowances for the diagnosis and performance of
45 warranty work and service shall be no less than what is
46 charged to retail customers for the same work to be
47 performed. The primary factor in determining reasonable
48 compensation for parts under this section shall be the
49 amount charged by the franchisee for similar parts to retail

SB 1081 3
50 customers for nonwarranty parts. No warranty or factory
51 compensated repairs shall be excluded from this requirement,
52 including recalls or other voluntary stop-sell repairs
53 required by the franchisor. If a franchisor is required to
54 issue a recall, the franchisee shall be compensated for
55 labor time as provided in this subsection.
56 (2) Franchisors shall pay the franchisee the same
57 effective labor rate that the franchisee receives for
58 customer-pay repairs, including vehicle diagnostic times for
59 all warranty repairs. Additionally, if a technician is
60 required to communicate with a technical assistance center,
61 engineering, or some other external franchisor source in
62 order to provide a warranty repair, the franchisor shall pay
63 for the time from start of communications until the
64 communication is complete.
65 (3) The franchisee may submit a request to the
66 franchisor for warranty labor rate increases a maximum of
67 once per calendar year. Any claim made by a franchisee,
68 including claims for additional compensation in specific
69 instances of warranty or recall repairs under this section
70 shall be either approved or disapproved within twenty days
71 after the claim is submitted to the franchisor in the manner
72 and on the forms the franchisor reasonably prescribes. An
73 approved claim shall be paid within twenty days after its
74 approval. If a claim is not specifically disapproved in
75 writing or by electronic transmission within twenty days
76 after the date on which the franchisor receives it, the
77 claim shall be considered to be approved and payment shall
78 follow within twenty days. No franchisor shall require a
79 franchisee to submit a claim authorized under this section
80 sooner than thirty days after the franchisee completes the
81 preparation, delivery, warranty, or recall service

SB 1081 4
82 authorizing the claim for preparation, delivery, or warranty
83 service.
84 (4) A franchisor or distributor shall not otherwise
85 recover its costs from franchisees within this state,
86 including an increase in the wholesale price of a vehicle or
87 surcharge imposed on a franchisee solely intended to recover
88 the cost of reimbursing a franchisee for parts and labor
89 pursuant to this section, provided a franchisor or
90 distributor shall not be prohibited from increasing prices
91 for vehicles or parts in the normal course of business.
92 3. A franchisor shall perform all warranty
93 obligations, including recall notices; include in written
94 notices of franchisor recalls to new motor vehicle owners
95 and franchisees the expected date by which necessary parts
96 and equipment will be available to franchisees for the
97 correction of the defects; and compensate any of the
98 franchisees in this state for repairs required by the
99 recall. Compensation for parts and labor for recall repairs
100 shall be determined under subsection 2 of this section. If
101 a franchisor imposes a recall or stop-sale on any new
102 vehicle in a franchisee's inventory that prevents the sale
103 of the vehicle, the franchisor shall compensate the
104 franchisee for any interest and storage until the vehicle is
105 repaired and made ready for sale.
106 4. [No franchisor shall require a franchisee to submit
107 a claim authorized under this section sooner than thirty
108 days after the franchisee completes the preparation,
109 delivery, or warranty service authorizing the claim for
110 preparation, delivery, or warranty service. All claims made
111 by a franchisee under this section shall be paid within
112 thirty days after their approval. All claims shall be
113 either approved or disapproved by the franchisor within

SB 1081 5
114 thirty days after their receipt on a proper form generally
115 used by the franchisor and containing the usually required
116 information therein. Any claims not specifically
117 disapproved in writing within thirty days after the receipt
118 of the form shall be considered to be approved and payment
119 shall be made within fifteen days thereafter. A franchisee
120 shall not be required to maintain defective parts for more
121 than thirty days after submission of a claim.
122 5.] A franchisor shall compensate the franchisee for
123 franchisor-sponsored sales or service promotion events,
124 including but not limited to, rebates, programs, or
125 activities in accordance with established written guidelines
126 for such events, programs, or activities, which guidelines
127 shall be provided to each franchisee.
128 [6.] 5. No franchisor shall require a franchisee to
129 submit a claim authorized under subsection [5] 4 of this
130 section sooner than thirty days after the franchisee becomes
131 eligible to submit the claim. All claims made by a
132 franchisee pursuant to subsection [5] 4 of this section for
133 promotion events, including but not limited to rebates,
134 programs, or activities shall be paid within ten days after
135 their approval. All claims shall be either approved or
136 disapproved by the franchisor within thirty days after their
137 receipt on a proper form generally used by the franchisor
138 and containing the usually required information therein.
139 Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within
140 thirty days after the receipt of this form shall be
141 considered to be approved and payment shall be made within
142 fifteen days.
143 [7.] 6. In calculating the retail rate customarily
144 charged by the franchisee for parts, service, and labor, the
145 following work shall not be included in the calculation:

SB 1081 6
146 (1) Repairs for franchisor, manufacturer, or
147 distributor special events, specials, or promotional
148 discounts for retail customer repairs;
149 (2) Parts sold at wholesale;
150 (3) Engine assemblies and transmission assemblies;
151 (4) Routine maintenance not covered under any retail
152 customer warranty, such as fluids, filters, and belts not
153 provided in the course of repairs;
154 (5) Nuts, bolts, fasteners, and similar items that do
155 not have an individual part number;
156 (6) Tires; and
157 (7) Vehicle reconditioning.
158 [8.] 7. If a franchisor, manufacturer, importer, or
159 distributor furnishes a part or component to a franchisee,
160 at no cost, to use in performing repairs under a recall,
161 campaign service action, or warranty repair, the franchisor
162 shall compensate the franchisee for the part or component in
163 the same manner as warranty parts compensation under this
164 section by compensating the franchisee at the average markup
165 on the cost for the part or component as listed in the price
166 schedule of the franchisor, manufacturer, importer, or
167 distributor, less the cost for the part or component. This
168 subsection shall not apply to entire engine assemblies,
169 propulsion engine assemblies, including electric vehicle
170 batteries, or entire transmission assemblies.
171 [9.] 8. A franchisor shall not require a franchisee to
172 establish the retail rate customarily charged by the
173 franchisee for parts, service, or labor by an unduly
174 burdensome or time-consuming method or by requiring
175 information that is unduly burdensome or time consuming to
176 provide, including, but not limited to, part-by-part or
177 transaction-by-transaction calculations. A franchisee shall

SB 1081 7
178 not request a franchisor to approve a different labor rate
179 or parts rate more than [twice in one] once per calendar
180 year.
181 [10.] 9. If a franchisee submits any claim under this
182 section to a franchisor that is incomplete, inaccurate, or
183 lacking any information usually required by the franchisor,
184 then the franchisor shall promptly notify the franchisee,
185 and the time limit to submit the claim shall be extended for
186 a reasonable length of time, not less than five business
187 days following notice by the franchisor to the franchisee,
188 for the franchisee to provide the complete, accurate, or
189 lacking information to the franchisor.
190 [11.] 10. (1) A franchisor may only audit warranty,
191 sales, or incentive claims and charge-back to the franchisee
192 unsubstantiated claims for a period of twelve months
193 following payment, subject to all of the provisions of this
194 section. Furthermore, if the franchisor has good cause to
195 believe that a franchisee has submitted fraudulent claims,
196 then the franchisor may only audit suspected fraudulent
197 warranty, sales, or incentive claims and charge-back to the
198 franchisee fraudulent claims for a period of two years
199 following payment, subject to all provisions of this section.
200 (2) A franchisor shall not require documentation for
201 warranty, sales, or incentive claims more than twelve months
202 after the claim was paid.
203 (3) Prior to requiring any charge-back, reimbursement,
204 or credit against a future transaction arising out of an
205 audit, the franchisor shall submit written notice to the
206 franchisee along with a copy of its audit and the detailed
207 reason for each intended charge-back, reimbursement, or
208 credit.

SB 1081 8
209 [12.] 11. A franchisee may file a complaint with the
210 administrative hearing commission pursuant to section
211 407.822 within sixty days after receipt of any written
212 notice by a franchisor of any adverse decision on any claim
213 for reimbursement submitted pursuant to this section,
214 including, but not limited to, specific claims for
215 reimbursement in individual warranty repair transactions,
216 and requests for an increase in labor or parts rate. If a
217 complaint is filed within the sixty days, then the denial or
218 reduction of reimbursement, denial of a request for an
219 increase in labor or parts rate, charge-back, or other
220 determination by a franchisor which is adverse to a
221 franchisee shall be stayed pending a hearing and
222 determination of the matter under section 407.822. The
223 franchisor shall file an answer to the complaint within
224 thirty days after service of the complaint. If, following a
225 hearing which shall be held within sixty days following
226 service of the franchisor's answer, the administrative
227 hearing commission determines that a franchisor has violated
228 any requirements of this section, then the denial or
229 reduction of reimbursement, denial of a request for an
230 increase in labor or parts rate, or charge-back shall be
231 void and the franchisor shall, within fifteen days of the
232 commission's order, fairly compensate the franchisee as
233 required by the provisions of this section. Section 407.835
234 shall apply to proceedings pursuant to this section.
✓